Oklahoma, session 2025, SB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the University


Hospitals Authority from any monies not otherwise appropriated from


the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Three Hundred Thousand Dollars


($300,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to contract


with a nonprofit that provides access to dentists at no cost to the


patients.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1030 WR 1/19/2025 5:40:20 AM

Req. No. 1030 Page 1